Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
SUBSEQUENT ACQUISITION OF SHARES
BY SHAREHOLDERS AND CORPORATION

7-106-301. Shareholders' preemptive rights.

The shareholders of a corporation do not have a preemptive right to acquire unissued shares except to the extent provided by subsections (3) to (6) of section 7-117-101 or the articles of incorporation.

A statement included in the articles of incorporation that "the corporation elects to have preemptive rights", or words of similar import, means that the following principles apply, except to the extent otherwise provided by subsections (3) to (6) of section 7-117-101 or the articles of incorporation:

The shareholders have a preemptive right, subject to any uniform terms and conditions prescribed by the board of directors to provide a fair and reasonable opportunity to exercise the right, to acquire proportional amounts of the unissued shares upon the decision of the board of directors to issue them.

A shareholder may waive the shareholder's preemptive right, and such waiver, if evidenced by a writing, is irrevocable even though it is not supported by consideration.

There is no preemptive right with respect to:

Shares issued as compensation to directors, officers, agents, or employees of the corporation or its subsidiaries or affiliates;

Shares issued to satisfy conversion or option rights created to provide compensation to directors, officers, agents, or employees of the corporation or its subsidiaries or affiliates;

Shares that are issued within six months after the effective date of incorporation; or

Shares sold otherwise than for cash.

Holders of shares of any class without general voting rights but with preferential rights to distributions or assets have no preemptive rights with respect to shares of any class.

Holders of shares of any class with general voting rights but without preferential rights to distributions or assets have no preemptive rights with respect to shares of any class with preferential rights to distributions or assets unless the shares with preferential rights are convertible into or carry a right to subscribe for or acquire shares without preferential rights.

Shares subject to preemptive rights that are not acquired by shareholders may be issued to any person, for a period of one year after being offered to shareholders pursuant to such preemptive rights, at a consideration set by the board of directors that is not lower than the consideration set for the exercise of preemptive rights. An offer at a lower consideration or after the expiration of such one-year period is subject to the shareholders' preemptive rights.

For purposes of this section, "shares" includes a security convertible into or carrying a right to subscribe for or acquire shares.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 761, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-106-302. Corporation's acquisition of its own shares.

A corporation may acquire its own shares, and, except as provided by section 7-117-101 (6), shares so acquired constitute authorized but unissued shares.

If the articles of incorporation prohibit the reissuance of acquired shares:

The number of authorized shares is reduced by the number of shares acquired by the corporation, effective upon amendment to the articles of incorporation; and

The corporation shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of amendment to the articles of incorporation, which are effective without shareholder action, that state:

The domestic entity name of the corporation;

The reduction in the number of authorized shares, itemized by class and series; and

The total number of authorized shares, itemized by class and series, remaining after reduction of the shares.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 762, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2002:

IP(2)(b) amended, p. 1847, § 109, effective July 1; IP(2)(b) amended, p. 1712, § 109, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(2)(b) and (2)(b)(I) amended, p. 2317, § 233, effective July 1, 2004.